Tennessee, session 114, SB1047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 2, Chapter 10, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) An organization or entity that is based in a country other than the United
States or that is based in the United States and receives funding from entities that are
based in countries other than the United States shall not make contributions, including
in-kind contributions, to a candidate or a political campaign committee. This prohibition
includes the promotion of the campaign or election through advertising, paying campaign
workers, or providing training for campaign or election staff.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-11-114(a), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision:
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), the speaker of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives shall not approve the acceptance of funding
from an organization or entity that is based in a country other than the United States or
that is based in the United States and receives funding from entities that are based in
countries other than the United States.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-12-118(a), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision:
SB1047
002017
- 1 -

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), the secretary of state or the secretary's
designee shall not approve the acceptance of funding from an organization or entity that
is based in a country other than the United States or that is based in the United States
and receives funding from entities that are based in countries other than the United
States.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002017